src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON GASSKALAMOS   !!= @CODE@ Inherent superlatives, gives onlys superl. Words that are lexicalized in their superlative forms. 
                 +A+Superl:%>          AMOS    ;
 +A+Superl+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>abmus%>it ENDLEX  ;

!!€gt-norm: ájtodamos # Even-syllable test
!!€ ájtodamos:           ájtodamos+A+Superl+Sg+Nom


!! !!Contracted stems
! ----------------

LEXICON SÁDNES !!= @CODE@  Attr same as pred. Sg Acc: sáddnáv, Attr: sádnes.
                        +A:%>Q1s ATTR              ;
! +A:%>Q1s VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A+Sg+Nom:%>Q1s ENDLEX            ;
                        +A:%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                        +A:%>X4  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4  PxV               ; !
                    +A+Ess:%>X4n ENDLEX            ;
                        +A:%>X4  BU/MUS            ;
        +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X4t ENDLEX            ;
               +A+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4  R                 ;
               +A+Cmp/PlGen:%>X4j R                 ;

!!€gt-norm: hávres # Contracted test
!!€ hávres:                 hávres+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ hávrráv:                hávres+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ hávres:                 hávres+A+Attr
!!€ hávrráp:                hávres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom

LEXICON GOAVSOS  !!= @CODE@ Attr same as pred. Sg Acc: goaksuv, Attr: goavsos.(goavsos is so far the only word in this lexicon)
                        +A:%>Q3s ATTR              ;
! +A:%>Q3s VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                 +A+Sg+Nom:%>Q3s ENDLEX            ;
                        +A:%>X4  ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                        +A:%>X4  N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4  PxV               ; !
                    +A+Ess:%>X4n ENDLEX            ;
                        +A:%>X4  BU/MUS            ;
        +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>X4t ENDLEX            ;
               +A+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4  R                 ;
               +A+Cmp/PlGen:%>X4j R                 ;

!!€gt-norm: goavsos # Contracted test
!!€ goavsos:                 goavsos+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ goaksuv:                 goavsos+A+Sg+Acc 
!!€ goaksusav:               goavsos+A+Sg+Acc # From lexicon TJIEGOS
!!€ goavsos:                 goavsos+A+Attr
!!€ goaksup:                 goavsos+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€ goaksusabbo:             goavsos+A+Comp+Sg+Nom # from lexicon TJIEGOS

LEXICON SUVRES  !!= @CODE@ Sg Acc: suvrráv, Attr: suvra.
                        +A:a%>Q1  ATTR              ;
! +A:a%>Q1 VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
                        +A:e%>Q1s VUOHTA            ;
                 +A+Sg+Nom:e%>Q1s ENDLEX            ;
                        +A:á%>    ILL-EVENCASEadj   ;
                        +A:á%>    N-EVENWEAKSTEMadj ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:á%>    PxV               ; !
                    +A+Ess:á%>n   ENDLEX            ;
                        +A:á%>    BU/MUS            ;
        +A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:á%>t   ENDLEX            ;
               +A+Cmp/SgNom:e%>Q1s R                 ;
               +A+Cmp/SgGen:á%>    R                 ;
               +A+Cmp/PlGen:á%>j   R                 ;

!!€gt-norm: suvres # Contracted test
!!€ suvres:                 suvres+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ suvrráv:               suvres+A+Sg+Acc
!!€ suvrrásav:               suvres+A+Sg+Acc # From lexicon SJÆVNNJAT
!!€ suvra:                 suvres+A+Attr
!!€ suvrráp:             suvres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€ suvrrásabbo:             suvres+A+Comp+Sg+Nom # from LINES

!! ----

!! !!!Comparation

LEXICON BU/MUS !!= @CODE@  comparison for even-syll adjectives. Also derivates diminutive and adverbs from the comparisions.
                                 +Comp:           BUStem       ;
                               +Superl:muss       BUOREMUS     ;
               +Comp+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:but        ENDLEX       ;
             +Superl+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:musá%>t    ENDLEX       ;
           +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:bu»sj%>    ENDLEX       ;
               +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg:bu»sj%>    ATTR         ;
                  +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:bu»ttja%>  CompSup-EVEN ;
+Err/Lex+Use/-Spell+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:bu»dtja%>  CompSup-EVEN ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:bu»ttja%>t ENDLEX       ;


LEXICON ABBO/AMOS !!= @CODE@  comparison for odd-syll adjectives.  Also derivates diminutive and adverbs from the comparisions.
!+Comp+Sg+Nom:ap%> K ;
!+Comp+Sg+Nom:up%> K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Nom:abbo%> K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Nom:ubbo%> K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:æbbo%> K ; !
                                       +Comp:ap%>        ATTR            ;
                   			     +Use/NG+Comp:up%>        ATTR            ;
                                        +Comp:            ABBO            ;
                                      +Superl:            AMOS            ;

                  +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:appu»sj%>   ENDLEX          ;
                      +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg:appu»sj%>   ATTR            ;
                         +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:appu»tj%>   CompSup-ODDCASE ;
         +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:appu»tj%>it ENDLEX          ;
                        +Comp+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:appo%>t     ENDLEX          ;
                      +Superl+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv:abmus%>it   ENDLEX          ;
														     
                +Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Comp+Err/Orth:æppo%>t     ENDLEX          ; !
              +Superl+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:ebmus%>it   ENDLEX          ; !
          +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:eppu»sj%>   ENDLEX          ; !
          +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:uppu»sj%>   ENDLEX          ;
              +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Err/Orth:eppu»sj%>   ATTR            ; !
              +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Err/Orth:uppu»sj%>   ATTR            ;
                 +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Err/Orth:eppu»tj%>   CompSup-ODDCASE ; !
                 +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Err/Orth:uppu»tj%>   CompSup-ODDCASE ;
 +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:eppu»tj%>it ENDLEX          ; !
 +Comp+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Der5+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:uppu»tj%>it ENDLEX          ;




! Comparative
! -----------

LEXICON BUStem !!= @CODE@ Comparative even-syll, case and attr.
                                 :p        ATTR    ;
                          +Sg+Nom:p        ENDLEX  ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bu%>     PxV  ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Gen:bu       ENDLEX  ;
                          +Sg+Abe:bu#dagi  ENDLEX  ;
                          +Sg+Abe:bu#dagá  ENDLEX  ;
                          +Sg+Abe:bu#tagá  ENDLEX  ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bu%>     PxV  ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Acc:buv      ENDLEX  ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bu%>     PxV  ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Ill:buj      ENDLEX  ;
                          +Sg+Ine:bun      ENDLEX  ;
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bun%>    PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Ela:bus      ENDLEX  ;
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bust%>   PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Sg+Com:bujn     ENDLEX  ;
                  +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:bujna    ENDLEX  ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bujn%>   PxCs ; ! !	   
                             +Ess:bun      ENDLEX  ;
                          +Pl+Nom:bu       ENDLEX  ;
                          +Pl+Gen:buj      ENDLEX  ;
                          +Pl+Abe:buj#dagi ENDLEX  ;
                          +Pl+Abe:buj#dagá ENDLEX  ;
                          +Pl+Abe:buj#tagá ENDLEX  ;
                          +Pl+Acc:bujt     ENDLEX  ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bujd%>   PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Pl+Ill:bujda    ENDLEX  ;
                          +Pl+Ine:bujn     ENDLEX  ;
 +Pl+Ine+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bujn%>   PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Pl+Ela:bujs     ENDLEX  ;
 +Pl+Ela+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:bujst%>  PxCs ; ! !	   
                          +Pl+Com:buj      ENDLEX  ;
