src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
ferjjodahkes:ferjjodahkke SÁDNES ;
gasskalamos:gasskal GASSKALAMOS ; !lexicalized
gatjádahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gatjádahkke SÁDNES ; !
goavsos:goaksu GOAVSOS ;
guobastahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guobastahkke SÁDNES ; !
gájkviekses+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gájk#viekºse SÁDNES ; !
gålmaktes:gålmakºte SÁDNES ;
gåssådahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gåssådahkke SÁDNES ; !
hiebadahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hiebadahkke SÁDNES ; !
hálmes:hálmme SÁDNES ;
hávres+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hávrre SÁDNES ; !
mihástahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mihástahkke SÁDNES ; !
målsudahkes:målsudahkke SÁDNES ;
niskudahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:niskudahkke SÁDNES ; !
skieges+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skiehke SÁDNES ; !
suvres+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:suvrr SUVRES ; !
sádnes:sáddne SÁDNES ;
sáltes:sállte SÁDNES ;
såbadahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:såbadahkke SÁDNES ; !
såjådahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:såjådahkke SÁDNES ; !
tjuottjes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuodtje SÁDNES ; !
vajáldahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vajáldahkke SÁDNES ; !
viehkedahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viehkedahkke SÁDNES ; !
vijses+v1+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vijsse SÁDNES ; !
vájbadahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vájbadahkke SÁDNES ; !
ájtodamos:ájtod GASSKALAMOS ;
æjgádahkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:æjgádahkke SÁDNES ; !
